THE BLADES QUESTLINE
A Campaign-Long Story Arc
Note: This questline is triggered by the party's actions at the White River Bridge checkpoint. If they betray Delphine to the Thalmor, this sequence begins. If they do not betray her, Delphine contacts them instead and this plays out very differently.

PHASE 1: THE AFTERMATH
Timing: Immediately after crossing the checkpoint
 Duration: 2-3 in-game days
THE RAID ON RIVERWOOD
If the party informed the Thalmor about Delphine and the Sleeping Giant Inn, Rulindil takes immediate action.
Day 1 (Morning After Checkpoint):
Rulindil sends a coded message to the Thalmor Embassy: "Potential Blade operative identified in Riverwood. Request authorization for immediate action."
The Embassy responds within hours: "Authorized. Capture alive if possible. Delphine is a priority target."
Day 2 (Evening):
A Thalmor strike team (8 Justiciars, 2 Wizards, led by Rulindil himself) arrives in Riverwood
They surround the Sleeping Giant Inn at midnight
Delphine fights but is overwhelmed (she kills two Justiciars before being subdued with Paralyze)
She's taken to the Thalmor Embassy in chains
Day 3 (Rumors Spread):
Word reaches Riften through travelers: "The Thalmor raided Riverwood. Arrested someone at the inn. People are scared."
Merchants whisper: "They took a woman. Blonde, forties. She fought like a soldier."
ESBERN'S RESPONSE
Esbern's Dead Drop System: Delphine and Esbern have a coded communication system:
Every three days, Delphine leaves a chalk mark on a specific wall in Riften (near the marketplace)
The mark means: "All clear, no contact needed"
No mark means: "Emergency, investigate"
Day 3 (Delphine Misses Check-In):
Esbern visits the dead drop location in Riften
No mark. He waits. Still nothing.
He begins investigation: talks to beggars, informants, traveling merchants
Within a day, he hears about the Riverwood raid
Day 4-5 (Esbern Investigates):
He sends a trusted beggar to Riverwood to gather details
The beggar returns: "Thalmor. Eight soldiers. They took a woman from the inn. The innkeeper said she was 'just a barmaid,' but nobody believes it."
Esbern knows. Delphine is captured or dead.
Day 6 (Esbern's Decision):
"I am alone. The last Blade. Delphine is gone. The dragons return. There is no Dragonborn. I must find another way."
He begins monitoring for dragon sightings, waiting for news of dragon-slayers.

PHASE 2: THE DRAGON-KILLERS
Timing: After the party kills Sahloknir at Kynesgrove
 Duration: 1-2 sessions
NEWS SPREADS
Immediate Aftermath (Hours After Kynesgrove):
Survivors flee to nearby settlements
Word spreads: "A dragon attacked Kynesgrove. The village is destroyed. But... someone killed it. Mercenaries. Warriors. They say the dragon's body burned away to nothing."
Day 1-2 (Rumors Reach Cities):
Merchants carry the story to Windhelm, Riften, Whiterun
The details are garbled: "Five warriors." "They had a giant with them." "One of them drank the dragon's blood."
But the core fact remains: A dragon was killed. By mortals.
Day 3 (Esbern Hears): Esbern's network of informants brings him the news. A beggar approaches him in the Ratway:
Beggar: "You wanted to know about dragons, yeah? There was one. Kynesgrove. Big one. Came out of the ground, they say. Alduin himself raised it from a burial mound."
Esbern: "And?"
Beggar: "And some group killed it. Wardens, they're calling themselves. The King's new agents or something. Four of them, maybe five. Got a Nord with them who's... wrong somehow. People say his blood boils."
Esbern's Reaction: He cross-references this with everything he knows:
The timing (right after a checkpoint incident)
The description (matches reports from Riverwood of armed travelers)
The fact they killed a dragon
He makes a decision: "They're all I have."

THE CONTACT
Esbern's Method: He doesn't approach directly. He's too paranoid. Instead:
Step 1: Observation (Day 4-5)
Esbern uses his network to track the party's movements
Where are they staying? Who are they talking to?
He watches them from a distance (high Guile, master of stealth)
He confirms: They're real. They're capable. They killed a dragon.
Step 2: The Intermediary (Day 6)
Esbern contacts a trusted courier (a beggar named Snilf)
He gives Snilf a sealed letter and 20 gold
"Deliver this to the Wardens. Do not tell them who sent you. If they ask, say only: 'A friend who knows what's coming.'"
The Letter: When the party receives this, it's written in careful, scholarly handwriting on old parchment:
To the Wardens who slew the dragon at Kynesgrove,
You have done what few mortals can claim: you have killed a dragon. Not just any dragon—Sahloknir, lieutenant of Alduin the World-Eater, raised from death by the Black Dragon himself.
You know, then, what I know: the dragons return. Alduin rises. The end of the world approaches.
The prophecy speaks of a Dragonborn who will stand against this darkness. I have searched for thirty years. I have found nothing. No Dragonborn walks Skyrim.
Which means we face the apocalypse alone.
I can help you. I have knowledge—of dragons, their lairs, their weaknesses. I have weapons from the Dragon War. I know where to find the answers we need to stop Alduin permanently.
But I cannot do this alone. I need dragon-slayers. I need you.
If you are willing, come to Riften. The Ratway, in the Warrens. Ask for "the old scholar." Come soon. Time is not our ally.
—A Friend
GM Notes:
The party can choose to follow up or ignore this
If they ignore it, Esbern will send increasingly desperate messages
If they ask around Riften about "the old scholar," everyone knows: "Oh, the crazy old man in the Ratway. Talks about dragons and the end times. Harmless, mostly."

THE MEETING
Location: The Ratway Warrens, Riften
 Setup: A maze of tunnels beneath Riften, filled with beggars, criminals, and Skooma addicts
When the party descends into the Ratway looking for Esbern:
The Approach:
They must navigate through the Ratway (potential encounters with thugs, beggars)
Eventually they reach the Warrens—a section of collapsed tunnels converted into makeshift rooms
One door is marked with a chalk symbol (a dragon's head, very faint)
The Door: If they knock, a voice from inside (old, suspicious):
Esbern: "Who sent you?"
The party must answer correctly (mention the letter, the dragon, etc.) or Esbern won't open the door.
Inside:
READ ALOUD:
"The door opens a crack, held by a chain. An old man's face appears—weathered, gaunt, with sharp gray eyes that miss nothing. He looks you over, one by one, his gaze lingering on weapons, armor, scars.
After a long moment, he removes the chain and steps back.
The room is small, cramped, and chaotic. Every surface is covered with books, scrolls, maps. The walls are plastered with sketches of dragons, ancient Nordic runes, and what appears to be a timeline of historical events. A single candle provides light.
The old man closes the door behind you and locks it. Three times.
'I am Esbern,' he says quietly. 'Last of the Blades. And you... you killed Sahloknir.'"

THE PITCH
Esbern's Opening: He doesn't waste time with pleasantries. He's desperate and shows it.
Esbern: "I'll be direct. The dragons are returning. Alduin—the World-Eater, the dragon who devoured the last world—has returned. He's raising his lieutenants from their graves. Sahloknir was the first. There will be more."
(He gestures to the timeline on the wall)
Esbern: "The prophecy of the Dragonborn is clear. When Alduin returns, a Dragonborn will rise to stop him. A mortal with the soul of a dragon, able to speak the Thu'um and devour dragon souls."
(His voice becomes bitter)
Esbern: "I've searched for thirty years. Delphine—my partner, my friend—searched even longer. We found nothing. No Dragonborn. No hero. No salvation."
(He looks at each of them)
Esbern: "But you killed a dragon. You did what the prophecy says only a Dragonborn can do. How?"
Let the party explain Kynesgrove.
Esbern's Response: After hearing their story:
Esbern: "Tactics. Preparation. Desperation. No divine gift. No dragon soul. Just... mortals, fighting for survival."
(He smiles, but it's sad)
Esbern: "Then that's what we have. Mortals. No prophecy. No chosen one. Just people who refuse to lie down and die."

THE OFFER
Esbern: "I need your help. And you need mine. Here's what I can offer:
Knowledge: I've spent forty years studying dragons. I know their weaknesses. Where they nest. How they hunt. How they think.
Weapons: I know the location of Sky Haven Temple, the last Blades sanctuary. Inside are weapons and armor from the Dragon War—Dragonbane, Blades Armor, equipment specifically designed to fight dragons.
A Plan: I know how the ancient Nords defeated Alduin the first time. It wasn't prophecy. It was knowledge, courage, and a willingness to do what was necessary. We can follow that path.
A Purpose: You've killed one dragon. If you walk away now, you'll spend the rest of your short lives running from the rest. But if you help me... we can end this. We can kill Alduin. We can save Skyrim."
(He pauses)
Esbern: "I won't lie to you. This will be dangerous. You might die. Probably will die. But you'll die as dragon-slayers. As heroes. As the people who stood when the world needed them."
(He extends his hand)
Esbern: "Will you help me?"

QUESTIONS & ANSWERS
The party will likely have questions. Here are Esbern's responses:
"What happened to the other Blades?"
"Dead. Slaughtered during the Great War by the Thalmor. The White-Gold Concordat made us illegal—enemies of the Empire we'd served for millennia. We were hunted. Most died fighting. Some fled. I hid. Delphine hid. And now... Delphine is gone too."
"Gone how?"
(Esbern hesitates, pain crossing his face) "She was in Riverwood. Gathering intelligence. She... stopped checking in. I investigated. The Thalmor raided the Sleeping Giant Inn three days ago. Took someone matching her description. Either she's captured, or she's dead."
"Can we rescue her?"
(Esbern looks at them with sudden, desperate hope) "You'd do that? You'd risk infiltrating the Thalmor Embassy for someone you've never met?"
(If yes:) "Then... yes. Yes, we can try. She's being held at the Embassy north of Solitude. It's a fortress, but if we can get you inside—disguised, perhaps, during one of their parties—you might be able to reach the dungeon. She knows their security. Their routines. With her help, we'd have a real chance."
(If no:) "I understand. It's a suicide mission. I... I just hoped..." (He composes himself) "Then we continue without her. She'd want us to. The mission is bigger than any one Blade."
"Why should we trust you?"
"You shouldn't. I'm a stranger hiding in a sewer, talking about the end of the world. For all you know, I'm mad."
(He gestures to the walls)
"But everything I've predicted has come true. I said Alduin would return. He did. I said he'd raise dragons from their graves. Sahloknir rose. I said there'd be no Dragonborn to save us. And where is he?"
(He meets their eyes)
"You don't have to trust me. But you killed a dragon. You know what's coming. And I'm offering you the tools to fight it. What else will you do? Wait for the next dragon to find you unprepared?"
"What do you get out of this?"
"A chance to fulfill my oath. The Blades exist to protect the people of Tamriel from the greatest threats. There is no greater threat than Alduin. If I die stopping him, I die with purpose. If I fail... well. We all die anyway."

ACCEPTING THE QUEST
If the party agrees to help:
Esbern: (visible relief) "Thank you. Truly. You've given me something I'd lost—hope."
(He moves to a table and unrolls a map)
Esbern: "Here's what we do first. Before we can face Alduin, we need to understand what we're fighting. That means finding Sky Haven Temple. It's hidden in the Reach, in the Karthspire. The temple holds Alduin's Wall—a complete record of the Dragon War, carved by Akaviri Blades three thousand years ago. It will tell us how the ancient Nords defeated Alduin the first time."
(He marks the location)
Esbern: "But first... if you're willing to risk it... Delphine. The Embassy. We need her. I need her."
(He looks at them)
Esbern: "Where do you want to start?"

PHASE 3: DIPLOMATIC IMMUNITY (OPTIONAL)
Timing: After recruiting Esbern, before Sky Haven Temple
 Duration: 1 session
 Prerequisite: Party agrees to rescue Delphine
THE PLAN
Esbern's Intelligence: "The Thalmor Embassy holds parties regularly—diplomatic receptions, meetings with Imperial officials, cultural events. It's how they maintain their image of civility while running a torture dungeon beneath. If we can get you an invitation to one of these parties, you can infiltrate during the chaos."
The Contact: Esbern knows a Wood Elf named Malborn who works at the Embassy as a servant. Malborn hates the Thalmor (they killed his family during the Great War) and has been feeding information to the Blades for years.
The Meeting: Esbern arranges a meeting with Malborn at the Winking Skeever in Solitude (ironic, given what the party did to Delphine).
Malborn: "You want to break into the Embassy? You're insane. But... if you're serious, I can help. There's a party in three days. Ambassador Elenwen is hosting Imperial dignitaries. Security will be tight, but during the party itself, there'll be distractions."
The Requirements:
An Invitation: Malborn can forge one, but the party needs a cover story (merchants, scholars, minor nobles, etc.)
Party Clothes: No armor allowed at the party. The party must acquire formal clothing.
Smuggled Gear: Malborn can smuggle weapons/armor into the Embassy ahead of time, hidden in the basement near the dungeon.

THE INFILTRATION
Structure: This is a stealth/social mission with an action climax.
PART 1: THE PARTY (Social/Stealth)
The Setting: The Embassy is filled with Thalmor officials, Imperial dignitaries, and wealthy merchants. Music, wine, conversation.
Objective:
Mingle and maintain cover (Guile checks to seem legitimate)
Find Malborn and get the key to the basement
Slip away from the party without being noticed
Key NPCs:
Elenwen: The Ambassador. Sharp, suspicious, and charming. She'll engage the party in conversation to assess them.
Rulindil: If he's still alive after the checkpoint encounter, he's here. He might recognize the party.
Malborn: Serving drinks. He'll slip the party the key and directions when safe.
Complications:
If Rulindil is present and recognizes them, he'll become suspicious
Elenwen may ask probing questions about their "business" in Skyrim
Random Thalmor guests may engage them in conversation, testing their cover story
PART 2: THE DUNGEON (Stealth/Combat)
The Descent:
Once the party has the key, they slip away to the basement
Malborn has hidden their gear in a chest near the kitchen
From there, they must navigate to the dungeon
The Dungeon: A small, grim series of cells beneath the Embassy.
Guards:
2x Thalmor Justiciars on patrol
1x Thalmor Torturer (in the interrogation room)
Delphine's Cell: She's in the furthest cell, weak but alive. When they find her:
Delphine: (weakly) "Who... sent you?"
If they mention Esbern:
"Esbern? He's alive? Thank the Divines. I thought... I thought I was the last."
If they reveal they betrayed her at Riverwood:
(Her expression hardens) "You. You told them about me. You sold me to the Thalmor."
(She grabs the cell bars, fury and pain in her eyes)
"Why are you here? To finish the job? To watch me hang?"
The party must convince her:
Guile Check (Very Hard, -6): Convince her they regret it, that Esbern sent them, that they need her
Alternative: Esbern sent a token (a Blades medallion) that proves they're legitimate
If convinced:
(Delphine takes a shaky breath) "Fine. Get me out of here. But know this—I don't trust you. I don't forgive you. But Esbern needs help, and I need to get out of this cell. We'll settle our debts later."
PART 3: THE ESCAPE (Combat)
The Alarm: Freeing Delphine triggers an alarm (magical ward on her cell, or a guard discovers the unconscious torturers).
The Response:
4x Thalmor Justiciars converge on the dungeon
2x Thalmor Wizards cut off escape routes
The party must fight their way out
Delphine's Contribution: Even weakened, she's a trained Blade. She'll grab a weapon from a fallen guard and fight alongside the party (though she's at half HP and has Disadvantage on all rolls due to torture/starvation).
The Route: Malborn opens a back exit—a smuggler's tunnel that leads out of the Embassy grounds. The party must reach it before being overwhelmed.
Success: They escape into the wilderness. The Thalmor will be hunting them, but they're free.

THE AFTERMATH
Delphine's State: She's physically injured and emotionally scarred. She needs rest, healing, and time.
The Reunion: When they bring her to Esbern in the Ratway:
READ ALOUD:
"Esbern opens the door and freezes. For a long moment, he just stares at Delphine—bruised, limping, but alive.
Then he steps forward and embraces her. No words. Just two old soldiers who thought they'd lost everything, holding onto the last friend they have left.
When they finally pull apart, Delphine wipes her eyes.
'I thought you were dead,' Esbern says quietly.
'I thought you were too,' Delphine replies. 'Guess we're both too stubborn to die.'
She turns to look at the party, and there's something hard in her eyes.
'Esbern says you're helping. That you killed a dragon. That you're... all we have.'
(She crosses her arms)
'I don't trust you. But I trust Esbern. And if he believes you can help stop Alduin, then I'll work with you. For now.'"
Moving Forward:
Delphine needs a few days to recover (mechanical rest, healing)
After she's stable, she and Esbern will both guide the party to Sky Haven Temple
Delphine is cold toward the party but professional—she won't let personal grudges stop the mission
If Delphine Was Not Rescued:
Esbern is deeply saddened but continues
He becomes more desperate, more willing to make moral compromises
The party proceeds to Sky Haven with just Esbern

PHASE 4: SKY HAVEN TEMPLE
Timing: After meeting Esbern (and optionally rescuing Delphine)
 Duration: 1 session
THE JOURNEY
Location: The Reach, near Karthspire
 Travel Time: 3-4 days from Riften
Esbern's Explanation (During Travel):
"Sky Haven Temple was built by the Akaviri Blades during the First Era, long before the Septim Empire. It was meant to be a sanctuary—a place to train dragon-slayers and preserve knowledge of the Dragon War. When the dragons were thought extinct, it was sealed and forgotten. Only a handful of Blades even knew it existed."
"Inside is Alduin's Wall—a complete historical record of the Dragon War, carved in stone. Every battle. Every victory. Every sacrifice. And most importantly... how the ancient Nords defeated Alduin the first time."
Delphine's Addition (If Present):
"We've never been inside. The temple requires the blood of a Dragonborn to open. We've been searching for a Dragonborn for decades, hoping to bring them here. Now..."
(She looks at Esbern)
"Now we're improvising."

KARTHSPIRE
The Exterior: A massive stone structure carved into a mountain, partially collapsed and overgrown. The entrance is a bridge across a chasm, guarded by a puzzle door.
The Forsworn: The area around Karthspire has been claimed by Forsworn (Reachmen rebels). They've set up camp near the temple entrance.
Options:
Stealth: Sneak past the Forsworn (Agility checks)
Combat: Fight through them (4-6 Forsworn warriors)
Diplomacy: Convince them you're not their enemy (Very Hard Guile check—they hate outsiders)
Esbern's Preference:
"We don't have time for a war. Sneak if you can. Fight if you must. But get us to that door."

THE BLOOD SEAL
The Door: A massive stone door carved with Akaviri symbols and a dragon's head. In the center is a hand-shaped indentation.
The Inscription (in Akaviri, translated by Esbern):
"Dragonblood shall seal and Dragonblood shall open. Only the chosen may enter."
The Problem: The seal requires the blood of a Dragonborn. There is no Dragonborn.
Esbern's Solution: He's been researching this for years. He has a theory.
Esbern: "The seal was designed to respond to dragon blood carried in mortal veins. But what if we bypass the 'mortal' part? You killed Sahloknir. His body burned away, but dragons leave traces—scales, bones, ichor. Did any of you collect anything from the remains?"
Options:
OPTION 1: Dragon Blood/Remains
If the party collected dragon scales, bones, or blood from Sahloknir (or any dragon):
Esbern: "Perfect. The seal can't tell the difference between blood in your veins and blood on your hands. Place the dragon remains on the seal."
Mechanic:
The party places dragon blood/scales/bones on the hand indentation
Esbern speaks an ancient Akaviri incantation
The seal glows red, recognizes the dragon essence, and opens
OPTION 2: Forced Entry (If No Dragon Blood)
If the party has no dragon remains:
Esbern: (frustrated) "Then we do this the hard way."
Options:
Magic: A powerful Destruction spell (Adept or higher) can shatter the ward (requires 15 FP and a Magic check)
Explosives: Dwarven oil + fire runes can blast the door (requires materials and an Agility check to set safely)
Brute Force: The party can attempt to physically break the ancient stone (multiple Might checks, takes time, alerts enemies)
OPTION 3: Esbern's Secret Knowledge
If all else fails, Esbern reveals he knows a bypass:
Esbern: "There's... another way. A Dovahzul phrase—Dragon Language—that forces the seal. I learned it from a text in the Arcanaeum. But using it will damage the door. It's sacrilege, defacing a Blades sanctuary. But if we have no choice..."
Mechanic:
Esbern speaks the Words of Power: "Zul Mey Gut" (Voice-Fool-Far)
The seal cracks, the door grinds open
Inside, some mechanisms are damaged (flavor only, doesn't affect the temple)

INSIDE SKY HAVEN TEMPLE
The Main Hall:
READ ALOUD:
"The door grinds open, revealing a vast hall carved from living stone. Pillars stretch toward a vaulted ceiling, and the air smells of dust and ancient incense. The walls are lined with empty weapon racks, broken training dummies, and faded banners bearing the symbol of the Blades—a dragon with a sword through its skull.
At the far end of the hall, dominating the entire wall, is Alduin's Wall.
It's enormous—thirty feet wide, twenty feet tall, covered in intricate carvings that seem to writhe in the torchlight. Dragons. Warriors. Battles. Prophecies. Thousands of years of history condensed into stone.
Esbern stands before it, tears in his eyes.
'By the gods,' he whispers. 'It's real. It's all here.'"

ALDUIN'S WALL
Esbern's Translation: He spends the next hour examining the wall, translating the Akaviri and Dovahzul inscriptions. The party can explore the temple, find loot, or rest.
What the Wall Shows (Esbern's Summary):
"This is the complete history of the Dragon War. Look here—" (points to the top) "—this is Alduin at the height of his power. The World-Eater, worshipped by ancient Nords as a god. He and his dragons ruled through terror. Entire kingdoms burned. Humans were slaves."
(He moves his hand down)
"Here—this is the rebellion. A man named Hakon One-Eye led the humans against the dragons. But they were losing. Dragon scales turned aside mortal weapons. Dragon breath incinerated armies. No matter how many humans fought, the dragons were unstoppable."
(He points to a specific section)
"Until this. Paarthurnax. Alduin's own lieutenant. He betrayed him. Taught humans the Thu'um—the Voice. Gave them the power to fight back on equal terms."
(He traces a series of carvings)
"The humans created a Shout specifically to fight dragons. Dragonrend. It forces dragons to understand mortality—to feel the fear of death. Dragons are immortal. They don't comprehend endings. Dragonrend makes them vulnerable. Grounds them. Allows mortals to kill them."
(He moves to the center of the wall)
"But even with Dragonrend, they couldn't kill Alduin. He was too strong. So they did something desperate. They used an Elder Scroll—a tear in time itself—to cast Alduin forward through the centuries. They banished him, hoping future generations would be ready."
(He points to the bottom of the wall)
"And here. The prophecy. When Alduin returns, a Dragonborn will rise. A mortal with the soul of a dragon. They will learn Dragonrend. They will absorb dragon souls. They will stand at the Throat of the World and face Alduin in single combat."
(He turns to the party, and his voice is heavy)
"That's the prophecy. That's how it's supposed to happen. A hero. Chosen by fate. Blessed by the gods."
(Pause)
"But there is no Dragonborn. Which means... we follow the old path. We find Paarthurnax. We learn Dragonrend. We get the Elder Scroll. And we kill Alduin ourselves. Prophecy be damned."

THE PLAN
Esbern lays out the steps:
Step 1: Find Paarthurnax
"He's the key to everything. He taught humans the Thu'um once—he can do it again. The Greybeards worship him. He lives atop the Throat of the World, at the peak of High Hrothgar."
Step 2: Learn the Way of the Voice
"We're not Dragonborn. We can't naturally speak the Thu'um. But with training, mortals can learn—it just takes discipline. The Greybeards can teach us the basics. Paarthurnax can teach us Dragonrend."
Step 3: Obtain the Elder Scroll
"The same Elder Scroll the ancient Nords used is still out there. I have leads on its location. We'll need it to understand how they cast Alduin through time—and possibly to weaken him when we fight."
Step 4: Kill Alduin
"Once we have Dragonrend, once we understand the Scroll, we find Alduin's lair and we end him. No prophecy. No chosen one. Just us."
Delphine's Addition (If Present):
"And after Alduin falls... Paarthurnax dies too."
Esbern: "Delphine—"
Delphine: "He's a dragon, Esbern. Alduin's brother. His lieutenant. Yes, he helped humans once. But he's still a dragon. And dragons always return to their nature. We can't risk it."
Esbern: (quietly) "Let's defeat Alduin first. Then we decide."

LOOT & REWARDS
Sky Haven Temple Contains:
Dragonbane: A unique Akaviri katana (One-Handed, Damage 10, Finesse, Special: +5 damage vs. dragons)
Blades Armor: Light armor sets (DR 3, Moon-Blessed: +1 FP, Special: +1 DR vs. dragons)
Blades Weapons: Various katanas and tantos (One-Handed, Damage 8, Finesse)
Ancient Texts: Skill books on combat, history, and dragon lore (+1 to relevant skills)
Gold: 500 gold in old Akaviri coins (historic value)
Esbern's Offer:
"Take what you need. These weapons were forged to kill dragons. You've earned them."

PHASE 5: THE THROAT OF THE WORLD
Timing: After Sky Haven Temple
 Duration: 1-2 sessions
HIGH HROTHGAR
The Journey: The party must climb the 7,000 steps to High Hrothgar, the monastery of the Greybeards.
The Greybeards: Four monks who have mastered the Way of the Voice. They speak in whispers because their full voice could shatter stone.
Master Arngeir: The only Greybeard who speaks normally. He greets the party:
Arngeir: "Travelers. We felt the Voice used in anger. We felt a dragon die. We expected... the Dragonborn. But you are not them."
Esbern's Response:
"Master Arngeir, I am Esbern, last of the Blades. These are the warriors who killed Sahloknir. There is no Dragonborn. Alduin returns, and we have no prophecy to save us. We need Paarthurnax. We need to learn Dragonrend. We need to stop the World-Eater ourselves."
Arngeir's Reaction: He is deeply troubled.
Arngeir: "Paarthurnax waits atop the mountain. But he waits for the Dragonborn, not... mercenaries. You seek Dragonrend? That Shout is a curse. It is hatred given form. It corrupts those who speak it. And you seek to learn it without the discipline of a lifetime's training?"
(He shakes his head)
Arngeir: "Paarthurnax will not see you. Not unless you prove yourselves worthy."

THE TRIALS
Arngeir's Test: The party must prove they can handle the Way of the Voice before being allowed to meet Paarthurnax.
Trial 1: Ro (Balance)
The party must meditate and achieve inner calm (Guile check)
Those who fail are overcome by emotion and cannot proceed
Trial 2: Dah (Push)
The Greybeards teach the party the Unrelenting Force Shout (Fus Ro Dah)
The party must demonstrate control by Shouting at targets without destroying them (Agility check for precision)
Trial 3: Strun (Storm)
The party must face a test of endurance—standing in a blizzard atop the monastery while the Greybeards Shout around them (Might check to resist being blown off the mountain)
Success: If the party passes all three trials:
Arngeir: (grudging respect) "You have... potential. More than I expected. Very well. The path to the summit is open. Paarthurnax will decide if you are worthy."

MEETING PAARTHURNAX
The Summit: The highest peak in Skyrim. Wind howls. Snow swirls. The air is thin.
The Dragon: Perched on the Word Wall is Paarthurnax—an ancient dragon, his scales gray with age, his eyes wise and weary.
READ ALOUD:
"The dragon is enormous, but he does not move. He simply watches you approach with eyes that have seen millennia pass. When he speaks, his voice is deep, resonant, and... calm.
'Drem yol lok. Greetings. I have waited long for dov-ah-kiin. But you are not them. You are... dragonslayers. Dovah-lot. Dragon-hunters.'
(He tilts his head, studying you)
'Yet you killed Sahloknir. You stopped his resurrection. This was not foreseen. Perhaps... perhaps the prophecy is fluid. Perhaps there is another way.'"
Esbern's Introduction:
"Great Paarthurnax, I am Esbern of the Blades. We seek your help. Alduin returns. The dragons rise. But there is no Dragonborn to stop them. We must follow the old path—learn Dragonrend, understand the Elder Scroll, and face Alduin ourselves."
Paarthurnax's Response:
"Dragonrend. Joor zah frul. The Shout that broke Alduin's power. It is a terrible weapon. It forces dragons to feel mortality—to understand death. For creatures who are eternal, this is... agony. Madness. A violation of our very nature."
(He looks at each of them)
"Are you prepared to wield such a thing? To speak hatred and death into the world?"
The party must answer.
Paarthurnax (After Their Answer):
"Very well. I will teach you what I can. The Way of the Voice. The philosophy of restraint. And... if you prove worthy... I will help you obtain Dragonrend. But know this: that Shout is a curse. It corrupts those who use it. Even the ancient Nords who created it were changed by it."
"You must be strong. Not just in body, but in spirit. Or the Shout will consume you."

TRAINING MONTAGE
Over the next several days, Paarthurnax trains the party:
Day 1-3: Meditation and Breath
Learning to feel the Voice within themselves
Controlled breathing exercises
Resisting the urge to Shout in anger
Day 4-7: Basic Shouts
Mastering Fus (Force)
Learning Ro Dah (Balance Push)
Practicing on targets without killing
Day 8-10: Philosophy
Paarthurnax teaches the Way of the Voice
"The Thu'um is not a weapon. It is a tool. Used with restraint, it brings balance. Used with anger, it brings destruction."
The party learns discipline (mechanical benefit: +1 to Magic checks when using Shouts)
Day 11: The Offer
"You have learned well. Better than I expected. You are ready for the next step. To learn Dragonrend, you must witness its creation. You must see the moment it was forged—the moment three ancient heroes spoke their hatred into existence."
"This requires the Elder Scroll. The same Scroll that cast Alduin through time. With it, you can look back and see that moment. Learn the Shout. And understand the price."

ESBERN'S SUSPICION
Throughout the training, Esbern watches Paarthurnax carefully.
Esbern (Quietly to the Party, When Paarthurnax Is Not Near):
"Don't trust him. He's a dragon. Yes, he helped us once. But dragons are eternal. They don't change. They can't change. He served Alduin for centuries—ruled alongside him, burned cities, enslaved humans. Then he betrayed him. What's to stop him from betraying us?"
Delphine (If Present):
"Esbern's right. I've seen what dragons do. Even the 'good' ones. They're predators. Conquerors. It's in their nature. When Alduin is dead, Paarthurnax will be the oldest, the strongest. He could take Alduin's place. Rule the dragons. And we'd have traded one tyrant for another."
The Tension: This plants the seed for the later choice. Let the party debate among themselves.

PHASE 6: THE ELDER SCROLL
Timing: After training with Paarthurnax
 Duration: 1 session
THE SEARCH
Paarthurnax's Guidance:
"The Elder Scroll you seek was lost after the Dragon War. But it was not destroyed. Elder Scrolls cannot be destroyed. They exist outside time. They are time."
"Seek the scholars who study such things. The College of Winterhold. Or the Moth Priests of Cyrodiil. They may know where it rests."
Esbern's Knowledge:
"I've researched this. There's a Moth Priest in Skyrim—brought north by the Empire to study a Scroll in their possession. If we can find him, we can find the Scroll."
The Trail:
The party investigates and learns the Moth Priest (Dexion Evicus) was traveling to Forebears' Holdout
They find him there, but he's been attacked by vampires (foreshadowing Dawnguard content if you're running that)
He's blind (Moth Priests go blind from reading Scrolls) but alive
He tells them the Elder Scroll is in Blackreach, hidden in the Tower of Mzark
BLACKREACH
The Journey: The party must navigate the ruins of Alftand, a Dwarven ruin, to reach the underground city of Blackreach.
Blackreach: A massive, bioluminescent cavern filled with Falmer, Chaurus, and Dwarven automatons.
Tower of Mzark: A Dwarven mechanism designed to store the Elder Scroll. The party must solve a puzzle (Lexicon Receptacle) to access it.
The Elder Scroll: When retrieved, it hums with temporal energy. Reading it requires preparation (Paarthurnax will guide them later).

PHASE 7: THE TIME-WOUND
Timing: After obtaining the Elder Scroll
 Duration: Part of a session
RETURN TO THE THROAT OF THE WORLD
Paarthurnax:
"You have the Scroll. Now you must read it. But not here. There is a place where time is... thin. Where the past bleeds into the present. The Time-Wound, created when the ancient Nords cast Alduin forward. It exists atop this mountain, near where we stand."
The Time-Wound: A shimmering distortion in the air, barely visible.
The Reading: One party member (chosen by the group) reads the Elder Scroll while standing in the Time-Wound.
The Vision:
READ ALOUD:
"The world dissolves. You are standing on this same mountaintop, but it is thousands of years ago. The sky is dark with dragons. Below, you see armies clashing—Nords fighting for their freedom.
Before you stand three warriors: Hakon One-Eye, a Nord hero with a massive battleaxe. Gormlaith Golden-Hilt, a warrior-woman with fury in her eyes. Felldir the Old, a mage with an Elder Scroll in his hands.
And descending from the sky, roaring with rage, is Alduin.
The three heroes stand together. They speak in unison, their voices layered with power:
'JOOR ZAH FRUL!'
The Shout hits Alduin like a physical blow. For the first time, the immortal dragon feels. He feels the weight of mortality. The terror of endings. The finite nature of existence.
He crashes to the ground, stunned and vulnerable.
The heroes rush forward to strike, but Alduin is too strong. Even weakened, even mortal for this brief moment, he fights back.
Felldir raises the Elder Scroll. He speaks words in a language you don't understand—the language of time itself.
A rift opens. Alduin roars in defiance as he's pulled into it, forward through the centuries, banished but not destroyed.
The last thing you see is Hakon's face, filled with grim determination:
'This isn't over. Someday, someone will have to finish what we started.'
The vision ends. You're back on the mountaintop, gasping for air. But the Words are in your mind now. Burned into your soul.
Joor. Zah. Frul.
Mortal. Finite. Temporary.
You have learned Dragonrend."

THE AFTERMATH
Paarthurnax:
"You have seen it. The moment Dragonrend was born. The moment three mortals spoke their hatred of dragons into existence. Do you understand what you have learned? That Shout is not just a weapon. It is a philosophy. It is the belief that dragons are wrong. That immortality is a sin. That we must end."
(He looks sad)
"Every time you speak those Words, you speak that hatred. You tell the world that dragons must die. Even me."
Esbern:
"Good. Because that's exactly what needs to happen."

PHASE 8: THE IMPOSSIBLE CHOICE
Timing: After learning Dragonrend, BEFORE facing Alduin
 Duration: Climactic roleplay scene
THE CONFRONTATION
The Setup: The party returns to Sky Haven Temple (or another neutral location) to prepare for the final assault on Alduin.
Esbern's Speech: He gathers the party together.
Esbern: "We have everything we need. Dragonrend. The Elder Scroll. The knowledge. Tomorrow, we find Alduin's lair. We use Dragonrend to ground him. We fight him as mortals fought him three thousand years ago. And this time, we finish it."
(He pauses)
Esbern: "But there's one more thing that must be done. Before we face Alduin, Paarthurnax must die."
Delphine (If Present):
"He's right. Paarthurnax is Alduin's brother. His lieutenant. Yes, he betrayed Alduin once—but what happens when Alduin is dead? Paarthurnax is the oldest, the strongest. He could take Alduin's place. Rule the dragons. And we'd have traded one tyrant for another."
Esbern:
"The Blades exist to protect mortals from dragons. All dragons. Even the ones who smile and speak philosophy. Especially those ones. They're the most dangerous because they make us forget what they are."
"Paarthurnax ruled alongside Alduin for centuries. He burned cities. He enslaved humans. He was a tyrant. Yes, he changed sides. But he's still a dragon. And dragons... dragons always return to their nature. It's inevitable."
"Kill him now. Before we face Alduin. It's the only way to be sure."

THE PARTY'S RESPONSE
Let the party debate. This is a critical decision point. Give them time.
Arguments in Favor of Killing Paarthurnax:
He's a dragon—predators by nature
He did serve Alduin for centuries
He could take over after Alduin's death
Esbern and Delphine are experienced dragon-hunters
Better safe than sorry
Arguments Against Killing Paarthurnax:
He's been helping them
He's spent 3,000 years teaching restraint
He's the only one who can guide dragons toward peace
Killing him would betray trust
The Greybeards would never forgive them

CONFRONTING PAARTHURNAX
If the party decides to kill him:
They return to the Throat of the World. Paarthurnax is waiting.
Paarthurnax: "Drem yol lok. You return. Are you ready to face Alduin?"
If they reveal their intent:
(He is silent for a long moment)
"I see. The Blades have spoken. And you have listened."
(He does not move to defend himself)
"I understand. I am dov. My nature is domination. I have fought this nature for three thousand years, but it never leaves me. If you believe I am too dangerous to live, then strike. I will not resist."
"But know this: I am the last who remembers the Way of the Voice. The last who can teach restraint. When I die, that knowledge dies with me. The remaining dragons will have no guide. No teacher. They will return to their nature—conquest and destruction. You will have chosen security over hope."
(He bows his head)
"The choice is yours. But choose wisely."
The party must decide.

PATH A: KILL PAARTHURNAX
The Fight: Paarthurnax does not resist. He could fight—he's an ancient dragon, more powerful than Sahloknir—but he chooses not to.
Mechanics:
He has 100 HP, DR 8, and devastating breath attacks
But he does not use them
He simply... accepts death
Each attack the party makes, he speaks:
Paarthurnax (As They Attack):
"Krosis. Forgive me. I tried to change. I tried to be better."
(Another blow)
"Perhaps... perhaps they are right. Perhaps dragons cannot change."
(Another blow)
"Zu'u lost dii korah. I have done my duty. The Voice will endure... or it will not."
(Final blow)
"Drem... yol... lok..."
He dies. His body burns away, leaving only bones and a word wall behind.

Immediate Consequences:
Esbern:
(Standing over the remains, solemn) "It's done. You've done the right thing. The hard thing. The thing that needed to be done."
(He places a hand on their shoulder)
"The Blades will remember this. You honored our oath—protect the people, at any cost."
Delphine (If Present):
(She's conflicted—relief mixed with grief) "He... he didn't even fight. I expected... I don't know what I expected. But not that."
(She shakes her head)
"It was still the right choice. We can't take chances. Not with dragons."
The Greybeards: When the party descends the mountain, Master Arngeir is waiting at High Hrothgar. His face is stone.
Arngeir: "You have murdered the master. The last who remembered the Dragon War. The last who could teach the Way of the Voice."
(His voice is cold, final)
Arngeir: "You are not welcome here. Not now. Not ever. Leave. And do not return."
The Greybeards turn their backs. The door to High Hrothgar closes. Forever.

Impact on Alduin Fight:
No Paarthurnax to provide guidance or support
The party must face Alduin alone with only Esbern and Delphine
Slightly harder fight (no dragon ally)
Epilogue Consequences:
Dragons scatter without leadership after Alduin's death
Some are hunted down by mortals and the Blades
Others terrorize the countryside, leaderless and angry
It becomes a war of attrition—dragons vs. mortals, ongoing
The Blades reform as dragon-hunters, constantly pursuing threats
Skyrim is "safe" but scarred, always watching the skies
The Way of the Voice is lost—no more training available
The Greybeards refuse all contact with the party
Esbern and Delphine are satisfied but haunted by Paarthurnax's final words

PATH B: SPARE PAARTHURNAX
The Confrontation with Esbern:
Party: "We're not killing Paarthurnax."
Esbern: (long silence, then:)
"What?"
Party explains their reasoning.
Esbern: (rising anger)
"You're refusing? After everything? After what he is? He's a dragon! He served Alduin for centuries! He could betray us tomorrow, next week, next year! And you're willing to take that risk?!"
Delphine (If Present):
"Esbern, maybe—"
Esbern: (cutting her off)
"No. NO. The Blades have one purpose—protect mortals from dragons. If you won't do that, then you're not Blades. You're dragon-lovers. Fools who'll get everyone killed."
(He grabs his gear)
"I spent forty years in hiding. Forty years waiting for the Dragonborn. For someone who could end this. And when they don't come, when I'm forced to turn to you, you betray everything the Blades stand for."
(He heads for the door)
"The Blades die here. I am the last, and I will not serve those who protect dragons. Face Alduin if you want. Win or lose, I don't care anymore. I'm done."
Delphine (If Present): She's torn. She looks at the party, then at Esbern.
Delphine: "Esbern... they killed a dragon. They're trying to save Skyrim. Isn't that enough?"
Esbern: "Not if they let Paarthurnax live."
Delphine: (after a long pause, quietly) "Then I'm sorry. But my oath is to the Blades. To Esbern. Not to you."
(She follows Esbern out.)
They leave. The party is alone.

Immediate Consequences:
Esbern and Delphine are gone
The Blades are finished
The party loses access to Blades equipment and knowledge
But they keep Paarthurnax
The Greybeards: When the party returns to High Hrothgar:
Arngeir: "You spared the master. You chose wisdom over fear. You have our gratitude."
(He bows)
Arngeir: "The Way of the Voice endures because of you. We will continue to teach. To guide. To offer what knowledge we can."
Paarthurnax:
"You chose hope over certainty. You trusted a dragon. This is... rare. Perhaps mortals and dov can coexist. Perhaps the cycle of violence can be broken."
"I will guide my kin as best I can. Some will listen. Some will not. But I will try."

Impact on Alduin Fight:
Paarthurnax provides guidance and moral support
He may join the fight at a critical moment (dragon ally)
Slightly easier fight
Epilogue Consequences:
Paarthurnax becomes the leader of dragons after Alduin's death
He teaches the Way of the Voice to dragons who will listen
Some dragons follow, embracing peace and restraint
Some dragons refuse, continue to terrorize Skyrim
It's a gamble—better than full-scale war, but not perfect safety
Skyrim has dragon allies AND dragon enemies
The Blades are gone forever
Esbern dies bitter and alone, believing the party doomed the world
Delphine (if alive) disappears, possibly joining Esbern in exile

PATH C: CONVINCE ESBERN (Very Hard)
The Challenge: The party attempts to convince Esbern that Paarthurnax should live and that the Blades must evolve.
Mechanics: This requires three separate Very Hard (-6) Guile (Persuasion) checks, each representing a different line of argument.
Argument 1: Evidence of Change "Paarthurnax has proven himself over 3,000 years. He's had countless opportunities to return to tyranny. He hasn't."
Guile Check (Very Hard, -6):
Success: Esbern pauses. "Three thousand years... that is a long time. Longer than any Blade has lived. Longer than the Empire has existed. If he were going to betray us, he's had ample opportunity."
Failure: "Time means nothing to dragons. They're immortal. Three thousand years is a heartbeat to them. He could be patient. Waiting."

Argument 2: Practical Necessity "We need him. Not just for Alduin, but for after. Who else can lead the dragons toward peace? Who else can mediate between mortals and dov?"
Guile Check (Very Hard, -6):
Success: Esbern's resolve wavers. "You're saying... we need a dragon to control dragons. A warden, not just hunters."
Failure: "That's appeasement. Letting the enemy police themselves. It never works."

Argument 3: Legacy and Evolution "The Blades were founded to protect people. Not to hunt every dragon forever. If we kill Paarthurnax, we're not protectors—we're just killers. The world has changed. The Blades must change with it."
Guile Check (Very Hard, -6):
Success: Esbern sits down heavily. This is the hardest one for him to hear.
Failure: "The Blades' purpose is clear. If we abandon it, we abandon everything."

If All Three Checks Succeed:
Esbern: (after a very long silence)
"Perhaps... perhaps you're right. Perhaps I've been so focused on what the Blades were that I couldn't see what they could become."
(He looks at his hands)
"We were dragon-slayers. For millennia, that's all we were. Hunt. Kill. Protect. But in a world where dragons return... where they can't all be killed... perhaps we must be something else."
"Dragon-wardens. Watching. Mediating. Preventing wars before they start. Hunting the ones who can't be redeemed, yes. But... working with the ones who can."
(He looks at Paarthurnax, when they next meet him)
"I will spare you, dragon. But I will watch you. Always. If you falter—if you return to your nature—I will know. And I will act."
Paarthurnax: "That is... acceptable. Zu'u los ni oblaan—I am not eternal in my goodness. But while I live, I will guide my kin toward the Voice, not the fire. And if I fail... you will do what must be done."

Delphine (If Present): She's shocked.
Delphine: "Esbern... are you sure?"
Esbern: "No. I'm not. But they're right—the world has changed. If we cling to the past, we die with it. The Blades must evolve, or the Blades must end."
(He looks at the party)
Esbern: "You've given me something I lost—hope. Not certainty. Not safety. But hope. That's enough."

Immediate Consequences:
Esbern agrees to a "New Blades" philosophy
Watchers and mediators, not just hunters
They hunt rogue dragons and protect peaceful ones
Greybeards are grateful
Paarthurnax lives
Thu'um training continues
Impact on Alduin Fight:
Paarthurnax provides maximum support
Esbern provides tactical knowledge
Both philosophies (combat and restraint) combine
Easiest version of the fight
The party has allies on all sides
Epilogue Consequences:
Best possible outcome
Paarthurnax leads willing dragons to peace
The "New Blades" hunt rogue dragons and protect peaceful ones
Skyrim has dragon allies working alongside reformed Blades
Not perfect peace, but genuine coexistence
Some dragons still cause trouble, but they're the minority
Esbern finds new purpose, dies with hope instead of bitterness
Delphine (if alive) becomes a mediator between dragons and mortals
The Way of the Voice endures and spreads

If Any Check Fails: Esbern is not convinced. The party must choose between Path A (kill Paarthurnax) or Path B (spare him and lose the Blades).

PHASE 9: FACE ALDUIN
Timing: After the choice regarding Paarthurnax
 Duration: Final boss fight session
FINDING ALDUIN'S LAIR
Paarthurnax's Knowledge (If Alive):
"Alduin will return to Sovngarde—the Nordic afterlife. It is there he devours the souls of the dead, growing stronger. You must follow him. Confront him in the realm of the gods."
Esbern's Knowledge (If Still With Party):
"There's a portal to Sovngarde at Skuldafn—a dragon temple in the Jerall Mountains. It's heavily guarded by dragons and draugr. Getting there will be a battle. But if Paarthurnax is right, that's where Alduin is."
Delphine's Addition (If Present):
"We'll need a way to get to Skuldafn. It's on a mountain peak—inaccessible by foot. We'll need to... convince a dragon to take us."
Paarthurnax (If Alive):
"Odahviing. One of Alduin's generals. He is proud. Arrogant. If you challenge him—lure him to a place where he can be trapped—you may be able to force him to serve you."

TRAPPING ODAHVIING (Optional)
The Setup: The party uses the Dragonrend Shout to force Odahviing to land in Whiterun (the Jarl agrees to help trap him in Dragonsreach).
The Fight: Odahviing is a powerful dragon (TL 3 Boss). The party uses Dragonrend to ground him, then battles until he's weakened.
The Capture: Once reduced to low HP, Odahviing is trapped in Dragonsreach's great hall.
The Negotiation: Odahviing: "You are strong. Stronger than I expected. Very well. I will take you to Skuldafn. But know this—Alduin grows stronger by the day. You may already be too late."

SKULDAFN
The Assault: A massive dragon temple crawling with draugr and dragons.
Key Encounters:
Dragon priests
Draugr deathlords
Frost dragons
The Portal: At the summit of Skuldafn is a portal to Sovngarde, activated by a staff found in the temple.

SOVNGARDE
The Afterlife: A realm of eternal mist, where Nordic heroes feast in the Hall of Valor.
The Obstacle: Alduin has filled Sovngarde with mist, trapping souls and preventing them from reaching the Hall.
The Heroes: The party meets the three ancient Nord heroes from the vision: Hakon, Gormlaith, and Felldir. They agree to help.

THE FINAL BATTLE
The Arena: A cleared space before the Hall of Valor. The mist parts. Alduin descends.
The Fight:
Phase 1: Alduin is flying. The party uses Dragonrend to ground him.
Phase 2: Alduin lands. The party + the three heroes attack. Paarthurnax (if alive) joins.
Phase 3: When reduced to half HP, Alduin takes to the sky again. Repeat Dragonrend.
Phase 4: Final phase. Alduin fights with desperation.
Mechanics:
Alduin (Boss):
HP: 300 (divided across phases)
DR: 10
Attacks: Meteor Storm (AoE), Fire Breath, Tail Swipe, Bite
Special: Can only be damaged while grounded (requires Dragonrend)
Allies:
Hakon, Gormlaith, Felldir (each deals 15 damage/turn)
Paarthurnax (if alive, deals 20 damage/turn)
Esbern and Delphine (if present, provide tactical bonuses)
Victory: When Alduin reaches 0 HP:
READ ALOUD:
"Alduin staggers, his wings torn, his scales shattered. For the first time in his existence, he feels fear.
He tries to speak—to bargain, to threaten—but the words die in his throat.
The final blow lands. Alduin, the World-Eater, the First-Born of Akatosh, the dragon who devoured the last world... dies.
His body does not burn away. Instead, it dissolves into light—streams of soul-energy that spiral upward into the sky, dissipating into nothing.
The mist clears. The souls trapped in Sovngarde are free. In the distance, you hear the sound of celebration from the Hall of Valor.
It's over. Alduin is dead. The world is saved.
You did it."

EPILOGUE: THE CONSEQUENCES
Paarthurnax Killed:
Dragons scatter, leaderless
Some are hunted, some rampage
Skyrim enters a war of attrition
The Blades reform as dragon-hunters
The Way of the Voice is lost
The Greybeards never forgive
Esbern and Delphine are satisfied but haunted
Paarthurnax Spared (Blades Left):
Paarthurnax leads dragons toward peace
Some follow, some don't
Skyrim has dragon allies and enemies
The Blades are gone forever
Esbern dies bitter
The Way of the Voice endures
Paarthurnax Spared (Esbern Convinced):
Paarthurnax leads dragons toward peace
The New Blades mediate between mortals and dragons
Most dragons follow Paarthurnax
Rogue dragons are hunted by Blades
Genuine coexistence
The Way of the Voice spreads
Esbern finds peace

GM NOTES
This questline is designed to:
Replace the "Call of the Greybeards" with Esbern's recruitment
Provide meaningful choices with lasting consequences
Fix Bethesda's mistakes with the Paarthurnax choice
Make the Blades questline feel epic and complete
Respect player agency while maintaining narrative weight
Key Principles:
The choice about Paarthurnax happens BEFORE Alduin so it has mechanical impact
All three outcomes (kill, spare with Blades leaving, spare with Blades convinced) are valid
The "convince Esbern" path is hardest but gives the best outcome
Delphine's fate is tied to the party's earlier betrayal
Esbern is desperate, not evil—he genuinely believes he's protecting people
Pacing:
Phase 1-2: 1 session (Esbern contact)
Phase 3: 1 session (Embassy rescue, optional)
Phase 4: 1 session (Sky Haven)
Phase 5-6: 1-2 sessions (Paarthurnax training, Elder Scroll)
Phase 7-8: 1 session (Time-Wound, Paarthurnax choice)
Phase 9: 1 session (Alduin fight)
Total: 6-8 sessions spread across the campaign

END OF BLADES QUESTLINE DOCUMENTATION

APPENDIX: THE BLADES QUESTLINE
CAMPAIGN CLOCK: THE LAST BLADE
This questline represents the complete arc of Esbern and the Blades in a world without a Dragonborn. It begins with betrayal and ends with an impossible choice that will shape Skyrim's future.

PHASE 0: THE BETRAYAL (Adventure Conclusion)
What Happens: If the party betrays Delphine by informing the Thalmor about the Sleeping Giant Inn, this questline activates.
Immediate Consequences:
Within 2-3 days, a Thalmor strike team raids the Sleeping Giant Inn
Delphine fights but is overwhelmed (she's outnumbered 8-to-1)
She's taken alive to the Thalmor Embassy
Orgnar (the innkeeper) survives but is terrified and traumatized
Riverwood becomes much more hostile to strangers
Delphine's Status:
Captured, Not Killed: The Thalmor know she's a Blade - this is a MASSIVE intelligence coup
She's being interrogated for information about remaining Blades, hideouts, and operations
She hasn't broken yet, but she's suffering
She's held in the Embassy dungeon, guarded heavily
Esbern's Discovery:
Esbern and Delphine have a dead drop system (coded messages left in hidden locations)
When Delphine misses her scheduled check-in (3 days later), Esbern knows something is wrong
He investigates carefully through his network of beggars and informants
Within a week, he learns: "Thalmor raided Riverwood. Woman matching Delphine's description captured."
Esbern goes into deeper hiding, grief-stricken but grimly determined

PHASE 1: THE SUMMONS
Trigger: Party kills Sahloknir at Kynesgrove
Timeline: 3-5 days after the dragon's death
THE NEWS SPREADS
Dragon attacks are unprecedented. The news spreads like wildfire through Skyrim's taverns, trading posts, and courier networks.
What People Are Saying:
"A dragon attacked Kynesgrove! Burned half the village!"
"Group of mercenaries killed it - some kind of royal agents"
"They call themselves 'Wardens' - chartered by the High King himself"
"One of them punched the dragon so hard it exploded" (exaggerated, but based on Kyboh's hit)
Esbern's Intelligence Network: Esbern maintains contacts throughout Skyrim:
Beggars who eavesdrop and trade information for coin
Stable workers who hear travelers' stories
Couriers who pass through Riften regularly
Thieves Guild contacts (through mutual necessity, not alliance)
Within days, multiple sources bring him the same story: "The Wardens killed a dragon at Kynesgrove."
ESBERN'S DECISION
Esbern is alone. Delphine is gone (captured or dead, he doesn't know which). The dragon apocalypse is beginning, and there is NO Dragonborn.
He makes a desperate calculation:
"They killed a dragon. Most warriors couldn't even scratch one. They're alive, which means they're skilled. They're all I have. I must reach out."
THE CONTACT
Esbern doesn't approach directly - he's too paranoid. He uses an intermediary.
The Messenger: A street urchin in Riften (or wherever the party is staying) approaches them with a sealed letter. The boy says: "A old man paid me five septims to give you this. Said you'd know what it means."
The Letter:
To the Wardens of Kynesgrove,
You killed the dragon Sahloknir. I know what's coming. I know why the dragons return. I can help you kill more.
I have knowledge - dragon lairs, their weaknesses, ancient techniques. I have weapons and armor from the Dragon War itself. And I know how to stop this permanently.
Meet me in Riften. The Ratway, Warrens district. Ask for "the scholar." Come alone or together, but come soon.
The World-Eater rises, and we have no Dragonborn to save us.
- A Friend
GM Notes:
The letter is written in a shaky but educated hand
The wax seal is broken/unmarked (Esbern doesn't advertise the Blades)
The phrase "World-Eater" should intrigue anyone familiar with Nord mythology
The mention of "no Dragonborn" is ominous and true

PHASE 2: THE RATWAY MEETING
Location: The Ratway Warrens, Riften
 Tone: Paranoid, desperate, but hopeful
THE DESCENT
The Ratway is Riften's underbelly - a maze of tunnels beneath the city where the desperate and criminal hide. To reach the Warrens, the party must navigate:
The Ragged Flagon:
A thieves' den and tavern run by the Thieves Guild
NPCs here are suspicious but not hostile (unless the party has pissed off the Guild)
Asking for "the scholar" gets knowing looks: "Oh, the crazy old man. Yeah, he's back in the Warrens. Good luck."
The Warrens:
The deepest, dampest section
Esbern's "room" is a converted storage chamber with a reinforced door
The door has multiple locks and a viewing slot
THE GREETING
When the party knocks, a suspicious voice comes through the slot:
Esbern: "Who sent you? Who gave you this location?"
Correct Answers:
"You did. Through a letter."
"A street urchin. You paid him five septims."
"We killed a dragon. You said you could help."
Wrong Answers / Hostile Approach:
Esbern assumes they're Thalmor agents
He refuses to open the door
Party must make Very Hard (-6) Guile (Persuasion) check to convince him
THE TEST
Even if they give correct answers, Esbern tests them through the door:
Esbern: "The dragon at Kynesgrove. How did you kill it?"
He's listening for specific details that prove they were actually there:
Description of Sahloknir's appearance (bronze/green scales, frost breath)
Mention of Alduin's presence (the black dragon that resurrected it)
The dragon's soul being absorbed (by someone? Into the sky? Unclear?)
If They Pass: The locks click open. The door swings inward.
ESBERN'S APPEARANCE
READ ALOUD:
"The man who opens the door looks ancient. He's at least seventy, with a long grey beard and wild hair that hasn't seen a comb in weeks. His robes are travel-stained and patched, and his hands shake slightly as he ushers you inside.
But his eyes - his eyes are sharp, intelligent, and burning with desperate intensity.
The room behind him is cramped and cluttered. Every surface is covered with books, scrolls, maps, and notes. A bed in the corner looks unused. The walls are plastered with drawings - dragon anatomy, ancient runes, star charts, timelines.
This is not a hiding place. This is a research bunker.
He locks the door behind you with shaking hands, then turns.
'Thank the Divines. You came. You actually came.'"
THE PITCH
Esbern doesn't waste time with pleasantries. He's been alone too long, and the apocalypse is here.
Esbern's Introduction:
"I am Esbern. Last of the Blades. You don't know that name anymore - we were wiped out thirty years ago by the Thalmor. Hunted. Murdered. Our order destroyed because we served the Dragonborn Emperors, and the Aldmeri Dominion wanted us gone."
(He gestures to the walls covered in notes)
"I've spent three decades hiding in sewers and attics, researching, searching for the one thing that could save us: the Dragonborn. The prophecy is clear - when the dragons return, the Dragonborn will rise to stop them."
(His voice breaks slightly)
"But I've searched everywhere. Every rumor, every legend, every potential sign. And I've found nothing. No Dragonborn walks Skyrim. Which means we face the end of the world with no hero to save us."
(He looks directly at the party)
"You killed Sahloknir. You did what most armies couldn't do. You survived a dragon attack and struck back. That makes you the only hope I have left."
What Esbern Offers:
Knowledge:


Dragon lairs and migration patterns
Elemental weaknesses (frost dragons vs fire, etc.)
Anatomical vulnerabilities (wing joints, throat, eyes)
Thu'um (Shout) warnings and counters
Equipment:


Location of Sky Haven Temple (ancient Blades sanctuary)
Dragonbane (legendary Blades sword, dragon-slaying enchantment)
Blades Armor (light armor, designed for dragon combat)
Ancient potions and gear
A Plan:


"I know how the ancient Nords defeated Alduin the first time"
"I know where to find the answers we need"
"I know who can teach us to fight dragons as equals"
What Esbern Needs:
"Help me rebuild the Blades. Not the old order - that's dead. A new one. Dragon-killers. Protectors of Skyrim. Help me stop Alduin before he devours the world."
(He pauses)
"Please. You're all I have left."
THE DELPHINE QUESTION
If the party asks about other Blades, or if Esbern trusts them enough, he reveals:
Esbern: (voice tight with pain) "There was one other. Delphine. My... my friend. We worked together for years. She was in Riverwood, running an inn as cover, gathering intelligence."
(He looks away)
"She went silent three weeks ago. Missed our scheduled contact. I sent inquiries through my network. The Thalmor raided her inn. She's... she's either dead or captured."
(If the party looks guilty, he notices)
Esbern: "Why? Do you know something about this?"
GM Note: This is where the party's betrayal can come to light. How they handle this will determine Esbern's trust level:
Lie Successfully (Very Hard -6 Guile check): Esbern believes them, continues as planned
Tell the Truth: Esbern is devastated but pragmatic - "You... you did this. You gave her to them. Why? No - it doesn't matter. She's gone. And you're still all I have. Damn you."
Lie and Fail: Esbern sees through it, becomes permanently suspicious of the party
THE FIRST QUEST: PROOF OF COMMITMENT
Before revealing everything, Esbern wants proof the party is serious.
Esbern: "I need to know you're committed. There's a dragon lair - Bonestrewn Crest, in the mountains east of Windhelm. Ancient texts say a dragon named Nahagliiv has returned there. Kill it. Bring me proof. Then I'll take you to Sky Haven Temple and show you everything."
The Mission:
Travel to Bonestrewn Crest
Fight and kill Nahagliiv (use standard dragon stat block for party's tier)
Return with proof (dragon scales, bones, or just their word if Esbern trusts them)
Reward:
Esbern's full trust
Invitation to Sky Haven Temple
Advancement to Phase 3

PHASE 3: SKY HAVEN TEMPLE
Trigger: Party kills Nahagliiv and returns to Esbern
Location: Karthspire, The Reach
THE JOURNEY
Esbern leads the party to the Reach, to a remote canyon called Karthspire.
Travel Dialogue:
During the journey, Esbern opens up:
On the Blades: "We were founded in the First Era to serve the Dragonborn Emperors. Reman, Tiber Septim, the Septim Dynasty - we were their eyes, their swords, their shields. When the Septims fell and the Thalmor rose, we became targets. The Great War ended with the White-Gold Concordat, and one of its terms was our destruction. The Empire we served for thousands of years... they let us die."
On Delphine: "She and I escaped the purge. We've been running ever since. She was always braver than me - she stayed active, gathering intelligence, making contacts. I just... hid and researched. Maybe if I'd been braver, I could have protected her."
On Dragons: "Alduin is the World-Eater. The firstborn of Akatosh. In the Merethic Era, he ruled over mortals with tyranny and cruelty. The ancient Nords rebelled, and with the help of Paarthurnax - Alduin's own lieutenant who betrayed him - they learned the Thu'um. They couldn't kill Alduin, so they used an Elder Scroll to cast him forward through time. And now... time has caught up."
KARTHSPIRE
The canyon is ancient and overgrown. A river runs through it, and carved into the cliff face is a massive stone door - the entrance to Sky Haven Temple.
The Approach:
The area is infested with Forsworn (they've claimed the canyon as territory)
Party must fight through or sneak past them
Esbern can provide tactical advice but won't fight (he's too old/scared)
THE BLOOD SEAL
At the entrance, there's a puzzle: three pillars with rotating animal symbols (snake, whale, eagle - solution found in the environment).
But the real obstacle is the final door:
READ ALOUD:
"Beyond the pillars, the passage opens into a carved chamber. At the far end stands a massive circular door of stone, easily twelve feet tall. In its center is a mechanism - a shallow bowl carved into the rock, and above it, ancient Akaviri script.
Esbern approaches, reading the inscription aloud:
'Blood of the Dragonborn. Blood of the Dragon. The oath sealed in fire and scale.'
He turns to you, his expression grim.
'This seal was designed to respond to Dragonborn blood - the essence of Akatosh carried in mortal veins. But there is no Dragonborn.'"
THE SOLUTION
Esbern has spent years researching this exact problem.
Esbern: "The seal is designed to recognize dragon blood in mortal form. But what if we give it... actual dragon blood?"
(He pulls out a vial from his pack)
"I've carried this for thirty years. Blood from the last dragon killed before they vanished. It's degraded, barely potent. But combined with fresh dragon blood - from Sahloknir, from Nahagliiv - it might be enough."
The Ritual:
If the party collected dragon blood/scales/bones, Esbern can perform a ritual:
Mix the old blood with the new
Speak the Akaviri oath in Dovahzul
Pour the mixture into the bowl
The door responds.
READ ALOUD:
"The blood seeps into the stone. For a moment, nothing happens.
Then, a sound - a deep, rumbling grinding of stone on stone. Ancient mechanisms, dormant for thousands of years, creak to life. The circular door begins to roll aside, revealing a passage beyond lit by natural light filtering from above.
Esbern stands there, tears in his eyes.
'After all these years... we're home.'"
INSIDE SKY HAVEN TEMPLE
READ ALOUD:
"The temple is a marvel. Built into the mountain itself, it's a combination of fortress and sanctuary. The main hall is dominated by an enormous stone relief carved into the far wall - easily forty feet wide and twenty feet tall.
It depicts dragons and mortals in battle, ancient warriors wielding swords and bows, and at the center, a figure wreathed in light confronting a massive black dragon.
The room is dusty but intact. Weapon racks line the walls. Bookshelves hold ancient texts. Training dummies stand ready. Everything is preserved, waiting.
Esbern walks to the center of the room and spreads his arms.
'Alduin's Wall. The prophecy of the Dragonborn.'"
ALDUIN'S WALL
Esbern approaches the wall and begins reading the carved images like a story:
Esbern's Narration:
"This wall was carved during the Dragon War, thousands of years ago. It tells the complete prophecy of Alduin's return and defeat."
(He points to sections as he explains)
Panel 1 - The Dragon War: "Here - Alduin ruled over mortals with cruelty. The ancient Nords rebelled. This figure here - that's Paarthurnax, Alduin's lieutenant, teaching the first Tongues the Thu'um."
Panel 2 - The Banishment: "They couldn't kill Alduin. He was too powerful. So they used this - the Elder Scroll. They created a Shout called Dragonrend that forced Alduin to land, to understand mortality. Then they cast him forward through time."
Panel 3 - The Prophecy: "And here - the prophecy. 'When misrule takes its place at the eight corners of the world, when the Brass Tower walks and Time is reshaped, when the thrice-blessed fail and the Red Tower trembles, when the Dragonborn Ruler loses his throne, and the White Tower falls... then shall the sons of Skyrim spill their own blood.'"
(He looks at the party)
"Every condition has been met. The Oblivion Crisis. The fall of the Septim Dynasty. The Great War. And here—" (points to the final panel) "—the Dragonborn confronts Alduin and defeats him."
(Long pause)
"But there is no Dragonborn."
THE DESPERATE PLAN
Esbern: "I've studied this wall through transcriptions and fragments for thirty years. The prophecy is clear about the Dragonborn's role. But it also shows something else - how the ancient Nords defeated Alduin the FIRST time."
(He points to specific details)
"Three things were needed:
1. Dragonrend - The Shout that forces dragons to land, to comprehend death. Without it, Alduin cannot be truly harmed.
2. The Elder Scroll - The same scroll used to banish him originally. It may be needed again.
3. Paarthurnax - Alduin's brother, who betrayed him and taught mortals the Voice. He's still alive. He's been living on the Throat of the World, waiting for the Dragonborn."
(He turns to face them directly)
"We don't have a Dragonborn. So we follow the old path. We find Paarthurnax. We learn what he knows. We get Dragonrend. We obtain the Elder Scroll. And we kill Alduin ourselves."
The Party's Choice:
This is the moment the party can:
Commit to the plan: "We're in. Let's kill a god."
Question it: "Is this even possible without a Dragonborn?"
Refuse: "This is insane. Find someone else."
Esbern's Response to Doubt:
"Is it possible? I don't know. Probably not. The prophecy is clear - the Dragonborn defeats Alduin. But what choice do we have? Wait for a hero who isn't coming? Watch the world burn?"
(He looks at his hands)
"I'm an old man. I've spent my entire life running and hiding. Delphine is gone. The Blades are dead. This is my last chance to matter. To finish what my order started."
(He looks up at them)
"And you've killed two dragons. TWO. That's more than anyone has done in four thousand years. If anyone can do this... it's you."
THE ARMORY
If the party commits, Esbern gives them access to the temple's equipment:
Dragonbane:
A katana with a glowing Akaviri inscription on the blade
Stats: Damage 14 (One-Handed Sword, Finesse)
Enchantment: +10 Damage vs Dragons (total of 24 damage)
Property: On Critical Success vs dragons, the blade burns with dragonfire, dealing an additional +5 Fire Damage
Blades Armor (Light Armor Set):
Stats: DR 3 (Light Armor)
Property: Dragon Resistance - Take half damage from dragon breath weapons
Appearance: Red and black leather with Akaviri styling, scaled patterns
Blades Sword (Standard):
Stats: Damage 8 (One-Handed Sword, Finesse)
For NPCs/Companions: Esbern can arm followers with these
Ancient Potions:
3x Potion of Dragon Resistance (Take half damage from all dragon attacks for 3 rounds)
2x Potion of Fortified Might (+4 to Might TN for 3 rounds)
1x Elixir of True Sight (Cannot be affected by Illusion magic for one encounter)
THE MISSION FORWARD
Esbern: "Our next step is the Throat of the World. We must reach High Hrothgar and convince the Greybeards to let us pass. They guard the path to Paarthurnax. Without their blessing... we'd be climbing through a blizzard against masters of the Voice."
The Path Forward:
Travel to High Hrothgar
Convince the Greybeards to grant passage
Climb to the summit and meet Paarthurnax
Learn what he knows about Dragonrend and the Elder Scroll
Obtain both
Face the impossible choice
Confront Alduin

PHASE 4: HIGH HROTHGAR
Location: The Throat of the World, High Hrothgar Monastery
 NPCs: Master Arngeir, Borri, Wulfgar, Einarth (the Greybeards)
THE SEVEN THOUSAND STEPS
The pilgrimage to High Hrothgar is grueling - a steep climb up a mountain path marked by ancient shrines.
The Journey:
Takes a full day of climbing
Weather worsens as they ascend (cold, wind, eventually blizzard conditions)
Potential encounters: frost trolls, ice wraiths, or just the mountain itself
Esbern's Dialogue During the Climb:
"The Greybeards are masters of the Voice - the Thu'um. They've taken vows of silence, speaking only when absolutely necessary, because their voices are so powerful they could level buildings. Only Master Arngeir speaks regularly - his control is absolute."
"They believe the Voice should only be used for worship of Kynareth, never for violence. They're... pacifists. Warrior-monks who refuse to fight. They're going to be very skeptical of us."
ARRIVING AT HIGH HROTHGAR
READ ALOUD:
"The monastery emerges from the blizzard like a fortress of grey stone. It's built into the mountain itself, solid and ancient. The wind howls, but here, in the courtyard, it's strangely calm.
The doors swing open as you approach. Standing in the entrance is an elderly Nord man in grey robes. His eyes are sharp despite his age, and when he speaks, his voice carries a resonance that makes the air itself vibrate.
'We felt the death of the dragons. We felt the Voice used in anger. You are not dov-ah-kiin - you are not Dragonborn. Yet you come to the Throat of the World. Why?'"
MASTER ARNGEIR
Arngeir is the only Greybeard who speaks freely. The others communicate through him or through the Thu'um itself.
Arngeir's Position:
He knows dragons are returning
He's waiting for the Dragonborn (as prophecy demands)
He's deeply skeptical of mortals trying to use the Voice for violence
He will NOT grant access to Paarthurnax without proof of worthiness
The Initial Conversation:
Arngeir: "You killed Sahloknir and Nahagliiv. You are dragon-slayers. Hunters. But that does not make you worthy to meet the master."
Esbern: "Master Arngeir, with respect, there IS no Dragonborn. We've waited. We've searched. If we wait for prophecy while Alduin devours the world—"
Arngeir: (cutting him off) "The prophecy is CLEAR. The Dragonborn will come. They always have. Your impatience changes nothing."
Esbern: "And if you're wrong? If this time, there is no hero? What then?"
Arngeir: (long pause) "Then... we have failed. And the world ends as it was always meant to."
THE TEST OF WORTHINESS
Arngeir will not be argued with easily. He requires PROOF that the party is worthy to climb to the summit.
Arngeir: "If you truly believe you can walk the path meant for the Dragonborn, then prove it. Demonstrate that you understand the Voice, that you can wield it with discipline, not just violence."
The Three Trials:
TRIAL 1: THE SHOUT OF FORCE
Challenge: Learn and demonstrate the first word of Unrelenting Force (Fus)
Arngeir teaches them the word by speaking it, carving it into their mind with the Voice. They must then use it to strike a series of training targets with controlled precision - enough force to hit them, not enough to destroy them.
Mechanics:
Party must make Standard Magic checks to control the Shout
Success: They hit the target cleanly
Failure: Too much force (destroys target) or too little (misses)
They need 3 successes out of 5 attempts (as a group)
Purpose: This shows they can learn the Voice and control it

TRIAL 2: THE WAY OF PEACE
Challenge: Solve a conflict without violence
Arngeir presents a scenario: "Two monks of our order have a dispute. One believes we should aid Skyrim's people directly. The other believes we must remain isolated. They will not speak to each other. Mediate. Find peace."
Mechanics:
This is a social encounter with two stubborn NPCs (Borri and Wulfgar, communicating through writing)
Party must use Guile (Persuasion) to find common ground
Multiple approaches work: compromise, finding shared values, appealing to their vows
Requires at least 2 successful checks from different party members
Purpose: This shows they value peace and wisdom, not just strength

TRIAL 3: THE MEDITATION OF SILENCE
Challenge: Endure the mountain's trial
Arngeir leads them to an outdoor platform exposed to the elements. They must meditate in silence for one hour while the wind and cold batter them.
Mechanics:
Each party member makes a Might Save (Standard TN)
Success: They endure the cold and maintain focus
Failure: They lose focus and must be brought inside (counts against the trial)
At least half the party must succeed
Purpose: This shows they have discipline and endurance, the foundations of the Voice

THE JUDGMENT
If the party passes the trials (at least 2 out of 3):
Arngeir: (with grudging respect) "You have shown discipline. Control. Wisdom beyond what I expected from dragon-slayers. Perhaps... perhaps there is another path. One not written in prophecy, but forged by will."
(He gestures to the doors behind him, which lead up the mountain)
"The path to the summit is yours. Paarthurnax will see you. But know this - he is ancient beyond measure. He will judge you more harshly than I have. And if he finds you unworthy... the mountain will not let you leave."
If they fail the trials:
Arngeir: "You are warriors, yes. But warriors alone cannot walk the path of the Voice. Return when you have learned discipline. Until then, the summit is forbidden."
(The party must leave and return later, or attempt to climb the mountain without permission - which is possible but VERY dangerous)

THE FINAL CLIMB
With Arngeir's blessing, the party can climb the final stretch to the Throat of the World.
The Ascent:
The blizzard intensifies to near-impossible levels
Visibility drops to mere feet
The cold is brutal (party takes 2 Frost Damage per 10 minutes unless protected)
The path is treacherous - one wrong step means a fatal fall
Esbern stays behind - he's too old and frail to make this climb.
Esbern's Farewell: "I'll wait here. This is your journey now. When you meet Paarthurnax, remember - he's a dragon. No matter how wise he seems, he's still a dragon. Be careful."

PHASE 5: THE THROAT OF THE WORLD
Location: The Summit - The highest peak in Skyrim
 NPC: Paarthurnax, the ancient dragon
THE SUMMIT
READ ALOUD:
"The blizzard breaks suddenly as you crest the final ridge. The summit of the Throat of the World is a broad plateau of snow-covered stone, open to a sky so clear and blue it seems unreal.
And perched on the Word Wall at the center, his wings folded, his scales grey-white with age, is the largest dragon you've ever seen.
He's ancient. Scars crisscross his body - wounds from battles fought before your civilization existed. His eyes are amber, bright with intelligence, and when he turns his head to regard you, the movement is slow and deliberate.
When he speaks, his voice is a rumble like distant thunder, but there's no threat in it. Only... curiosity.
'Drem yol lok. Greetings. I have waited long for dov-ah-kiin. But you are not them. You are... dohvora. Dragonslayers. Hunters of my kin.'"
PAARTHURNAX
Paarthurnax is not hostile. He's intrigued.
Paarthurnax: "You killed Sahloknir. Nahagliiv. Both krosiir - brothers - of mine. Both servants of Alduin. Yet you stand here, not to slay me, but to... speak? Kriid. Curious."
(He shifts, his massive body settling on the Word Wall)
"Why have you climbed to the monahven - the mother-wind - if not to fulfill the prophecy? Where is dov-ah-kiin?"
THE CONVERSATION
The party must explain their situation. Paarthurnax will listen, interrupt with questions, and gradually piece together the truth.
Key Points to Cover:
There is no Dragonborn (Paarthurnax is shocked: "Ni dov-ah-kiin? This was not foreseen.")
Alduin is returning, resurrecting dragons (Paarthurnax: "Mu los fin. It has begun.")
They need to learn Dragonrend and find the Elder Scroll (Paarthurnax: "Ah. You seek the path the ancient Nords walked. Brave. Foolish. But brave.")
Paarthurnax's Response:
"You ask much. Dragonrend is not a gift - it is a curse. A Shout born of hatred, of forcing dov to feel rok - mortality. It corrupts those who use it. And you are already mortal. To use it is to weaponize your own death against my kin."
(He pauses, considering)
"But Alduin has returned. He breaks the natural order. He believes he is rah - god. He will devour the world not because it is time, but because he is vey - cruel."
(He looks at them directly)
"I will help you. Not because I believe you can succeed. But because I have spent three thousand years atoning for my own krosis - crimes. I will not let Alduin destroy what I have worked to preserve."
THE OFFER
What Paarthurnax Will Do:
Teach the Way of the Voice:


He will grant each party member ONE Shout word (their choice from: Fus/Ro/Dah for Unrelenting Force, or Feim for Become Ethereal)
He will explain the philosophy: "The Voice is not a weapon. It is a tool of understanding. Use it with kren - thought."
Guide Them to Dragonrend:


"Dragonrend is not written on any wall. It was created by mortals, born of their hatred of dov. To learn it, you must witness its creation."
"You need the Elder Scroll. The same scroll used to banish Alduin. It shows the past, the present, the future. With it, you can witness the moment Dragonrend was first used."
"The Scroll is hidden in a Dwemer ruin - Alftand, beneath Blackreach. The College of Winterhold knows where it lies."
Provide Strategic Knowledge:


"Alduin cannot be killed in Mundus - this world. If you strike him down here, he will simply flee to Sovngarde, the Hall of Valor, and regenerate."
"To kill him permanently, you must follow him to Sovngarde itself. There, cut off from Mundus, he can truly die."
"To reach Sovngarde, you need a portal. Only dragons know how to open them. When the time comes... I will help."
ESBERN'S SUSPICION
If Esbern were present (he's not - he stayed at High Hrothgar), he would be deeply suspicious. When the party returns and reports this conversation:
Esbern: "He's lying. He has to be. Dragons don't help mortals unless there's something in it for them. He's Alduin's brother - what if this is all a trap? What if he's leading you to Sovngarde so Alduin can kill you there?"
The party must decide: Do they trust Paarthurnax? Or Esbern?

PHASE 6: THE ELDER SCROLL QUEST
Trigger: Party agrees to seek the Elder Scroll
 Location: College of Winterhold → Alftand → Blackreach → Tower of Mzark
THE COLLEGE OF WINTERHOLD
The party must travel to the College to learn where the Elder Scroll is hidden.
NPC: Urag gro-Shub (the librarian)
Urag's Information: "An Elder Scroll? You're madder than most of the students here. Those artifacts are beyond mortal comprehension - looking at one can burn out your eyes or shatter your mind. But yes, I know where one is. The Dwemer were obsessed with them. There's a Scroll locked in a mechanism deep beneath Blackreach, in a place called the Tower of Mzark."
The Path:
Travel to Alftand (Dwemer ruin in the northern mountains)
Fight through automated Dwemer defenses (Dwarven Spheres, Spiders, Centurions)
Navigate Blackreach (vast underground cavern, full of Falmer)
Find the Tower of Mzark
Solve the mechanism puzzle to retrieve the Scroll
The Scroll's Effect:
READ ALOUD:
"The Elder Scroll unfurls in your hands, and the world BREAKS.
You're no longer in the tower. You're standing on the Throat of the World, but it's different. The sky is red. Dragons circle overhead. And before you, three ancient Nords in furs and iron stand facing a massive black dragon - Alduin.
One of them steps forward and SHOUTS. The word is not in any language you know, but you feel it in your soul:
'JOOR ZAH FRUL!'
Alduin SCREAMS. He's forced to land, wings crumpling, his immortal body suddenly vulnerable. The Nords attack.
And then you're back in the tower, the Scroll rolled shut in your hands, your head pounding with new knowledge.
You know Dragonrend now. You understand mortality as a weapon."
Game Effect:
All party members learn Dragonrend (Joor Zah Frul)
Cooldown: Once per combat
Effect: Forces one dragon to land and remain grounded for 3 rounds. During this time, the dragon is Vulnerable (all damage against it is increased by +5) as it experiences mortality for the first time.

PHASE 7: THE IMPOSSIBLE CHOICE
Trigger: Party returns to the Throat of the World with Dragonrend
 Location: Summit of the Throat of the World
 NPCs: Paarthurnax, Esbern (who has climbed up to meet them)
THE CONFRONTATION
The party arrives at the summit, ready to finalize their plan to face Alduin. Paarthurnax is pleased they succeeded.
But Esbern has followed them up the mountain. He's exhausted from the climb, shaking with cold and effort, but determined.
Esbern: (breathing hard) "Before you go to face Alduin... there's one more thing that must be done."
(He looks at Paarthurnax)
"The dragon must die."
ESBERN'S ARGUMENT
Esbern: "I know he's helped you. I know he seems wise and peaceful. But he's Alduin's brother. His lieutenant. Three thousand years ago, Paarthurnax ruled mortals as a tyrant. He burned villages. He enslaved nations. Yes, he betrayed Alduin - but only because he saw an opportunity for power."
(He steps forward, his old body trembling but his voice strong)
"What happens when Alduin is dead? Who leads the dragons then? Paarthurnax is the oldest, the strongest. He could take Alduin's place. And we'd have traded one tyrant for another."
"The Blades were founded to protect mortals from dragons. ALL dragons. Even this one. ESPECIALLY this one."
(He looks at the party)
"Kill him now, before we face Alduin. It's the only way to be sure. It's the only way to keep Skyrim safe."
PAARTHURNAX'S RESPONSE
Paarthurnax does not move. He simply watches, calm.
Paarthurnax: "Zu'u lost ni kos. I understand. I am dov. My nature is domination. Pruzah - power. I have fought this nature for three thousand years, but it never leaves. Every day, I choose. Every day, I resist."
(He looks at Esbern)
"You are right to fear me. I am dangerous. But I have proven myself through time. I have taught mortals to resist tyranny. I have guided the Greybeards. I have done no harm."
(He turns to the party)
"But I cannot prove what I will do tomorrow. I can only show what I have done yesterday. If you believe I am too dangerous to live, then strike. I will not resist. I have earned death many times over."
(Pause)
"But know this: I am the last who remembers the Way of the Voice. When I die, that knowledge dies with me. The remaining dragons will have no guide. No teacher. They will return to their nature - conquest and fire. Some may follow the path I showed them. Most will not."
(He settles onto the Word Wall)
"The choice is yours. Security in my death... or hope in my life."
THE THREE PATHS
This is the climax of the Blades questline. The party must choose.

PATH A: KILL PAARTHURNAX
If the party attacks, Paarthurnax does not fight back. He accepts his death.
READ ALOUD:
"Paarthurnax lowers his head, exposing his throat. His ancient eyes close.
'Krosis. I am sorry. For what I was. For what I could become. Zu'u lost ni kos.'
He does not move as the blade strikes. Does not cry out. His death is silent, dignified.
As his body dissolves into ash and light, his soul rises - not to one of you, but into the sky itself, dispersing like morning mist.
Esbern stands there, tears streaming down his face.
'Thank you. You've done the right thing. The hard thing. The Blades will remember this.'"
Immediate Consequences:
Esbern:
Fully committed to the party now
Provides maximum support for the Alduin fight
Will help rebuild the Blades after Alduin's death
Dies content, believing he fulfilled his duty
The Greybeards:
When the party returns to High Hrothgar, Arngeir refuses to speak to them
The doors are barred
A note is left: "You have murdered the master. You are not welcome here. Ever."
All Thu'um training is permanently lost
The Way of the Voice dies with Paarthurnax
Dragons:
With no leader, dragons scatter
Some are hunted down by Skyrim's forces
Others raid and terrorize independently
No unifying philosophy, no path toward peace
Alduin Fight:
No Paarthurnax to provide guidance or support
Party must face Alduin alone
Slightly harder difficulty (no dragon ally, no strategic advice)
Epilogue (After Alduin's Death):
Dragons become a persistent, ongoing threat
They raid holds, attack travelers, burn farms
It's not an apocalypse, but it's a constant war
The reformed Blades spend decades hunting dragons
Skyrim is "safe" but scarred
The party are celebrated as heroes, but at great cost
Esbern dies years later, satisfied his order's mission was completed
The knowledge of the Voice is lost forever

PATH B: SPARE PAARTHURNAX
If the party refuses to kill Paarthurnax:
Esbern: (voice breaking) "Then... then the Blades die here. I am the last. And I will not serve dragon-lovers. I will not betray everything my order stood for."
(He looks at the party with utter devastation)
"You've doomed us all. When he turns - and he WILL turn - remember this moment. Remember that you chose this."
(He turns and begins the climb back down the mountain)
"I'm done. Fight Alduin yourselves. Die yourselves. I want no part of it."
Immediate Consequences:
Esbern:
Leaves permanently
Will not help with the Alduin fight
Party loses access to Blades equipment and support
If Delphine was rescued, she goes with him (loyalty to Esbern)
Both disappear into hiding, bitter and broken
The Greybeards:
Arngeir is grateful when he learns of the decision
"You have shown wisdom beyond your years. The Way of the Voice endures."
Continued access to Thu'um training
The Greybeards will provide support (advice, training, sanctuary)
Paarthurnax:
Deeply grateful
"Zu'u tinvaak hi. I will not forget this trust."
Provides maximum support for Alduin fight
Will join the battle directly at a critical moment
Alduin Fight:
Paarthurnax participates, providing crucial support
He can tank some of Alduin's attacks
He provides tactical advice mid-fight
Slightly easier difficulty
Epilogue (After Alduin's Death):
Paarthurnax assumes leadership of the dragons
He teaches the Way of the Voice to those willing to learn
Some dragons follow - they embrace peace and restraint
Some dragons refuse - they continue raiding and killing
It's a mixed outcome: better than total war, but not perfect peace
Skyrim has dragon allies AND dragon enemies
The Blades are gone forever
Paarthurnax lives on, a constant presence on the Throat of the World
The party must trust that their gamble was worth it

PATH C: CONVINCE ESBERN (Very Hard)
This is the "best" ending, but it requires significant effort.
The Challenge:
The party must convince Esbern that sparing Paarthurnax is the right choice. This requires three Very Hard (-6) Guile (Persuasion) checks, each representing a different argument.
Argument 1: Evidence of Redemption "Paarthurnax has proven himself over three thousand years. He betrayed Alduin when he could have ruled beside him. He taught mortals the Thu'um, giving them the power to resist. He's had countless opportunities to return to tyranny, and he hasn't. That's not luck - that's choice."
Esbern's Counter: "Three thousand years of waiting. Waiting for the right moment. He's patient. Dragons are immortal - what's three millennia when you're planning to rule forever?"
Success: Esbern hesitates. "I... I suppose that's true. But..."

Argument 2: Practical Necessity "We NEED him. Not just for Alduin - for after. You said it yourself: dragons will return to their nature without guidance. Paarthurnax is the only one who can lead them toward peace. If we kill him, we guarantee a dragon war. If we spare him, we have a chance at something better."
Esbern's Counter: "And if that 'something better' is just a different kind of tyranny? What if he leads the dragons to conquer Skyrim more efficiently?"
Success: Esbern looks uncertain. "That... that could happen. But you're right. Without him, it's guaranteed war. With him... there's a chance."

Argument 3: Evolution of the Blades "The Blades' purpose was to serve and protect. For thousands of years, you served the Dragonborn Emperors. But there is no Dragonborn. There is no Empire. The world has changed. The Blades must change too. Not dragon-slayers - dragon-wardens. Watching. Mediating. Preventing wars before they start. That's how your order survives."
Esbern's Counter: "The Blades are dragon-slayers. It's what we ARE. If we're not that... what are we?"
Success: Esbern goes quiet for a long time. He looks at the mountains, at Paarthurnax, at his own shaking hands.

THE DECISION
If the party succeeds on at least two out of three checks:
Esbern: (voice hoarse) "Perhaps... perhaps you're right. Perhaps I've been so focused on what the Blades were that I couldn't see what they could become."
(He looks at Paarthurnax)
"We were dragon-slayers. Hunters. Protectors through violence. But in a world where dragons return... perhaps we must be something else. Wardens. Mediators. Preventing the wars before they burn the world."
(He turns back to the party)
"I will spare you, dragon. But I will watch you. Always. If you falter - if you return to your nature - I will know. And I will act."
Paarthurnax: "That is... acceptable. Zu'u los ni oblaan. I am not eternal. But while I live, I will guide my kin toward the Voice, not the flame. And you, last of the Blades... you may watch. It is your right."
Immediate Consequences:
Esbern:
Agrees to the "New Blades" philosophy
Remains with the party
Provides full support for Alduin fight
Will help rebuild the Blades as dragon-wardens after Alduin's death
Dies years later with hope, not bitterness
The Greybeards:
Grateful and impressed
Continued support and training
Arngeir: "You have shown wisdom that even we did not expect."
Paarthurnax:
Maximum trust and gratitude
Full support in Alduin fight
Will join the battle at the most critical moment
Provides ongoing guidance post-Alduin
Alduin Fight:
Both Esbern and Paarthurnax support the party
Easiest version of the fight
Combined Blades tactics and dragon knowledge
Epilogue (After Alduin's Death):
BEST OUTCOME: Paarthurnax leads willing dragons toward peace
The "New Blades" hunt rogue dragons and protect peaceful ones
Not perfect - some dragons still raid, some mortals still fear them
But genuine coexistence begins
Esbern rebuilds the Blades with a new purpose
The Way of the Voice endures
Skyrim is safer than it's been in millennia
The party created something new from the ashes of the old

PHASE 8: ALDUIN (The Final Battle)
Trigger: The Paarthurnax choice is resolved
 Location: Sovngarde (the Nordic afterlife)
OPENING THE PORTAL
With Dragonrend learned and the choice made, the party is ready to face Alduin.
The Problem: Alduin cannot be permanently killed in Mundus (the mortal world). If struck down here, he'll simply flee to Sovngarde and regenerate.
The Solution: They must follow him to Sovngarde and kill him there.
How to Open the Portal:
Paarthurnax (if alive) or ancient Blades texts (if not) reveal the method:
A dragon's shout can tear open a portal to Sovngarde
The portal requires a specific location: the Throat of the World (where the barrier between worlds is thinnest)
They must lure Alduin there and weaken him enough to flee
THE TRAP
The Plan:
Call Alduin to the Throat of the World (use the Clear Skies shout to break his storm)
Weaken him with Dragonrend (force him to land and fight)
Deal enough damage that he flees to Sovngarde
Follow him through the portal (with Paarthurnax's help to open/hold it)
Kill him permanently in the Hall of Valor
The First Fight (Throat of the World):
Alduin arrives in fury:
READ ALOUD:
"The sky darkens. Storm clouds gather, red and black, swirling with unnatural fury. And through the clouds descends a dragon larger than any you've faced.
Alduin is MASSIVE. His scales are black as midnight, edged with blood-red. His eyes burn with an ancient, terrible intelligence. When he roars, the mountain itself trembles.
'SAHROT THUR QAHNAARIN! Arrogant mortal insects! You dare stand where the Dovahkiin should stand? You dare challenge the World-Eater with stolen knowledge?'
He lands on the Word Wall with earth-shaking force.
'ZU'U UNSLAAD! I AM ETERNAL! I cannot be slain! This world is MINE to devour!'"
Combat Notes:
Alduin is a Legendary Tier Boss (adjust stats for party level)
He uses multiple Thu'um: Fire Breath, Meteor Storm, Fear
Dragonrend is essential - it forces him to land and makes him Vulnerable
Goal: Reduce him to 25% HP, then he flees
When Alduin Flees:
READ ALOUD:
"Alduin SCREAMS in rage and pain. His massive wings beat once, twice, lifting him into the air.
'NIVAHRIIN MORAH! Cowards who hide behind mortality! You have not won! I am eternal! I will return to Sovngarde and heal! And when I return, I will BURN THIS WORLD TO ASH!'
He tears through the sky, and reality RIPS. A portal of swirling light and shadow opens in the air above the Throat of the World - a gateway to the afterlife itself."
Paarthurnax (if alive): "The portal will not stay open long! I will hold it! Go! ZOK WUTH MAAR! Kill him in the Hall of Valor! End this!"
Esbern (if present): "This is it! Everything we've worked for! Don't let him escape! GO!"
SOVNGARDE
READ ALOUD:
"You step through the portal and emerge in a land of mist and eternal twilight. The sky is a swirling aurora of green and purple. The ground is stone, ancient and weathered, carved with runes.
Before you stretches a massive bridge made of whale bone, leading to a distant hall. The Hall of Valor - Shor's domain, where Nord heroes feast and fight for eternity.
But the path is blocked by mist - thick, poisonous, unnatural. This is Alduin's doing. He's feeding on the souls of the dead, growing stronger.
You can hear his voice echoing through the mist:
'This is MY realm now! The souls of Sovngarde will fuel my return! You cannot stop me here!'"
The Challenge:
The party must:
Use Clear Skies shout to part the mist (learned from Paarthurnax or the Greybeards)
Cross the bridge while fighting spectral enemies (Alduin's thralls)
Enter the Hall of Valor
Recruit three ancient Nord heroes to help fight Alduin
Face Alduin in the final battle
The Three Heroes:
Gormlaith Golden-Hilt (Warrior)
Hakon One-Eye (Archer)
Felldir the Old (Mage)
These are the same Nords who banished Alduin originally using the Elder Scroll.
Their Support:
They know Dragonrend (can help force Alduin to land)
They provide flanking support
They distract Alduin, giving the party openings
THE FINAL BATTLE
READ ALOUD:
"Alduin emerges from the mist at the center of Sovngarde, perched on a massive stone platform. He's healed, but he's also trapped - there's nowhere left to run.
'So. You have come to my domain. Here, I am STRONGEST. Here, the souls of warriors fuel my power. Here, you will DIE.'
The three ancient heroes step forward beside you.
Gormlaith raises her blade: 'For Skyrim!' Hakon draws his bow: 'For the living!' Felldir raises his staff: 'For the future!'
And the final battle begins."
Combat:
Alduin at full power (Legendary Boss, adjusted for party tier + 3 NPC allies)
Must use Dragonrend repeatedly to keep him grounded
The three heroes will fall one by one, leaving the party to finish him
When reduced to 0 HP, Alduin dies PERMANENTLY
Alduin's Death:
READ ALOUD:
"Alduin crashes to the ground, his massive body shuddering. Black blood pours from his wounds. He tries to rise, tries to shout, but no sound comes.
For the first time in existence, the World-Eater understands mortality.
'Zu'u... unslaad... I am... eternal...'
His body begins to crack. Light pours from the fissures - not the light of a dragon soul ascending, but something else. Something breaking apart.
The World-Eater dissolves into ash and light, and for the first time in thousands of years, Sovngarde is silent.
The three heroes stand at your side, watching.
Gormlaith: 'It is done. The prophecy is fulfilled... not by the one foretold, but by those who stood when no hero came.'
Felldir: 'You have done what we could not. You have ended the World-Eater's reign forever.'
Hakon: 'The living may rest easy. And we... we may finally do the same.'"
The Return:
The portal opens again. The party can return to Mundus.
When they emerge on the Throat of the World:
Paarthurnax (if alive) is waiting: "Alduin is no more. The dragons are free. What they do with that freedom... time will tell."
Esbern (if present) collapses in exhausted relief: "We did it. Against all odds. We actually did it."
The Greybeards (if friendly) emerge from High Hrothgar and bow: "The prophecy is fulfilled by will, not by fate. You have our respect."

EPILOGUE VARIATIONS
Based on the party's choice regarding Paarthurnax:
IF PAARTHURNAX WAS KILLED:
Immediate:
Esbern is satisfied, helps rebuild the Blades as dragon-hunters
Dragons scatter, leaderless
The Greybeards refuse all contact forever
The Way of the Voice dies
Years Later:
Dragons become a persistent threat across Skyrim
Regular attacks, raids, burnings
Not an apocalypse, but constant warfare
The Blades hunt dragons for decades
Skyrim is "safe" but scarred
Esbern dies years later, content his duty was fulfilled
The knowledge of the Voice is lost to history

IF PAARTHURNAX WAS SPARED:
Immediate:
Esbern leaves, bitter and broken
Paarthurnax assumes leadership of dragons
The Greybeards are grateful
The Blades are extinct
Years Later:
Some dragons follow Paarthurnax's teaching (peace, restraint)
Some dragons refuse, continue attacking
It's a mixed outcome: dragon allies AND dragon enemies
Skyrim has occasional dragon raids but also dragon protectors
The gamble pays off partially
The Way of the Voice endures through the Greybeards

IF ESBERN WAS CONVINCED:
Immediate:
Esbern agrees to "New Blades" philosophy (wardens, not hunters)
Paarthurnax lives and leads
Greybeards are grateful
Both ancient knowledge streams survive
Years Later:
Paarthurnax teaches Way of the Voice to willing dragons
The "New Blades" hunt rogue dragons, protect peaceful ones
Some dragons embrace peace, others remain hostile
But genuine coexistence begins
Not perfect, but hopeful
Esbern rebuilds the Blades with new purpose
Dies years later with hope instead of bitterness
Skyrim has both dragon allies and dragon-wardens
The best possible outcome

REWARDS
For Completing the Blades Questline:
Experience:
3 Advancement Points (spread across the questline, not all at once)
Equipment from Sky Haven Temple:
Dragonbane (Damage 14 One-Handed, +10 vs Dragons, Fire on Crit)
Blades Armor (DR 3 Light Armor, Dragon Resistance)
Ancient Potions (Dragon Resistance, Fortified Might, True Sight)
Knowledge:
Dragonrend Shout (Forces dragons to land, makes them Vulnerable)
Clear Skies Shout (Clears weather, parts mist)
One additional Shout word (from Paarthurnax, if spared)
Allies:
Esbern (if convinced or Paarthurnax killed)
Paarthurnax (if spared)
The Greybeards (if Paarthurnax spared)
Legacy:
The party's choice shapes Skyrim's future relationship with dragons
They become legends, remembered differently based on their choice:
"The Dragon-Slayers who ended the threat forever" (if killed Paarthurnax)
"The Dragon-Friends who gambled on peace" (if spared)
"The Wardens who forged a new path" (if convinced Esbern)

CONCLUSION
This questline replaces the need for a Dragonborn in the world. The party becomes the heroes not because of prophecy, but because of choice, determination, and sacrifice.
The Paarthurnax decision is the moral and narrative climax - not an afterthought, but the defining moment that determines what kind of world Skyrim becomes.
There is no "right" answer. Each choice has consequences. Each path shapes the future.
And in the end, the party must live with what they've chosen.



